District of Columbia statutes.
42-513

Future estates — Alternative.

Two or more future estates may be created to take effect in the alternative, so that if the first in order shall fail to vest the next in succession may be substituted for it and take effect accordingly.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1352, ch. 854, § 1026

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-213.
1973 Ed., § 45-813.